Washington statutes.
RCW 18.330.090

Disclosure of fees and refund policies.

(1) The agency shall clearly disclose its fees and refund policies to clients and providers. If the agency receives a fee regarding a client who was provided referral services for supportive housing, and the vulnerable adult dies, is hospitalized, or is transferred to another supportive housing setting for more appropriate care within the first thirty days of admission, then the agency shall refund a portion of its fee to the person who paid it, whether that is the client or the supportive housing provider. The amount refunded must be a prorated portion of the agency's fees, based upon a per diem calculation for the days that the client resided or retained a bed in the supportive housing.

(2) A refund policy inconsistent with this section is void and unenforceable.

(3) This section does not limit the application of other remedies, including the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 2011 c 357 s 10.]